Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1706
Fire, police, and emergency service; provision outside limits of city or village.

Any city or village may by resolution authorize its fire department or police department or any portion thereof to provide fire, police, and emergency service outside of the limits of such city or village either within or without the state.

Laws 1959, c. 55, § 1, p. 248;

Laws 1959, c. 56, § 1, p. 249;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 93.
August 28, 2021